Vermont, session 2025-2026, S29.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. chapter 47, subchapter 3A is added to read:
Subchapter 3A. Chloride Contamination Reduction Program
§ 1351. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Apply salt” or “application of salt” means to apply salt or a salt
alternative to roadways, parking lots, or sidewalks for the purpose of winter
maintenance or for summer dust control. “Apply salt” or “application of salt”
does not mean the application of salt to a transportation infrastructure
construction project.
(2) “Commercial salt applicator” means any individual who for
compensation applies or supervises others who apply salt but does not include
municipal or State employees.
(3) “Municipal salt applicator” means any individual who applies or
supervises others who apply salt in the applicator’s capacity as an employee or
agent of a town or a municipality but does not include State employees.
(4) “Salt” means sodium chloride, calcium chloride, magnesium
chloride, or any other substance containing chloride.
(5) “Salt alternative” means any substance not containing chloride used
for the purpose of deicing or anti-icing.
(6) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources.
VT LEG #379521 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.29
2025 Page 3 of 11
§ 1352. SALT APPLICATION PROGRAM
(a) The Secretary of Natural Resources, after consultation with the
Secretary of Transportation, shall establish a program for the education,
training, and certification of commercial salt applicators and municipal salt
applicators in the State to be implemented by a competitively selected third-
party vendor. The program shall include best management practices for
application of salt or salt alternatives by commercial salt applicators and
municipal salt applicators, but the program shall specifically exclude salt
applications related to transportation infrastructure construction projects.
(b) The education program for commercial salt applicators and municipal
salt applicators may be based on current best management practices used by
State salt applicators. The best management practices shall:
(1) establish measures or techniques to increase efficiency in the
application of salt or salt alternatives such that the least amount of salt or salt
alternatives are used while maintaining safe conditions for pedestrians and
motor vehicles on traveled surfaces;
(2) establish standards for when and how salt and salt alternatives are
applied in order to prevent salt or salt alternatives from entering waters of the
State;
VT LEG #379521 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.29
2025 Page 4 of 11
(3) recommend salt or salt alternatives that are cost-effective and less
harmful to water quality while maintaining safe conditions for pedestrians and
motor vehicles on traveled surfaces;
(4) establish record-keeping requirements for commercial salt
applicators and municipal salt applicators, including records describing the
type and rate of application of salt or salt alternatives, the dates of use, weather
conditions requiring use of salt or salt alternatives, and required submission to
the Agency of Natural Resources;
(5) establish requirements for application for certification under this
subchapter, including frequency of training, manner of training, and the form
and manner of application; and
(6) establish other requirements deemed necessary by the Secretary to
achieve the purposes of the program.
(c)(1) A commercial salt applicator or municipal salt applicator may apply
annually to the Secretary to be approved as a State-certified salt applicator.
(2) A business that employs multiple commercial salt applicators may
apply to the Secretary for certification of the business owner or other
designated employee as a master commercial salt applicator. A certified
master commercial salt applicator shall ensure that all employees of the
business are trained to comply with the best management practices established
under subsection (b) of this section.
VT LEG #379521 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.29
2025 Page 5 of 11
(d) The Secretary of Natural Resources, after consultation with the
Secretary of Transportation, shall:
(1) determine the amount of salt annually imported into the State;
(2) determine the average amount of road salt applied on State roadways
annually for the years 2010 through 2020 from:
(A) each winter road management season between October and
April; and
(B) salt solutions applied by the State, municipalities, and private
contractors from May through September for summer dust suppression;
(3) develop a publicly accessible record-keeping database system for
road salt purchases and applications within Vermont;
(4) develop salt reduction targets to guide the Agency of Natural
Resources in measurably reducing chloride levels in surface waters and
groundwater; and
(5) annually report to the Vermont General Assembly on or before
January 15 the findings as an assessment of the nature, scope, and magnitude
of associated impacts of salt on surface waters and groundwater, public and
private lands, property, health, and infrastructure in the State of Vermont.
VT LEG #379521 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.29
2025 Page 6 of 11
§ 1353. SALT APPLICATION; LIMITED LIABILITY; PRESUMPTION OF
COMPLIANCE; ENFORCEMENT
(a) A certified commercial salt applicator; a certified municipal salt
applicator; or an owner, occupant, or lessee of real property maintained by a
certified commercial salt applicator or certified municipal salt applicator shall
not be liable for damages arising from hazards on real property owned,
occupied, maintained, or operated by that person when the hazards are caused
solely by snow or ice and any failure or delay in removing or mitigating the
hazards is the result of the certified commercial salt applicator or certified
municipal salt applicator’s implementation of the best management practices
established under section 1352 of this title for application of salt or salt
alternatives, except when the damages are due to gross negligence or reckless
disregard of the hazard. All certified commercial salt applicators and certified
municipal salt applicators shall be presumed to be acting pursuant to the best
management practices for application of salt or salt alternatives in the absence
of proof to the contrary.
(b) A certified commercial salt applicator, a commercial salt applicator
employed by a certified master commercial salt applicator, or a certified
municipal salt applicator is presumed to be in compliance with the
requirements of this chapter when applying salt or salt alternatives according to
the best management practices established under section 1352 of this title.
VT LEG #379521 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.29
2025 Page 7 of 11
(c) A certified commercial salt applicator or certified municipal salt
applicator that violates the requirements of this subchapter, the rules of this
subchapter, or the provisions of a certification issued under this subchapter
shall be subject to enforcement under chapter 201 of this title.
(d) The Secretary may revoke a certification issued under this subchapter
after notice and opportunity for a hearing for a violation of the requirements of
this subchapter, the rules of this subchapter, or the provisions of a certification
issued under this subchapter.
(e) In order to receive the liability protection provided in subsection (a) of
this section, a commercial salt applicator; a municipal salt applicator; or an
owner, an occupant, or a lessee of land shall keep a written record describing
its winter road, parking lot, and property maintenance practices. The written
record shall include the type and rate of application of deicing materials used,
the dates of treatment, and the weather conditions for each event requiring
deicing. Such records shall be kept for a period of three years.
§ 1354. STORAGE AND DISPOSAL OF SALT
The Secretary of Natural Resources, after consultation with the Secretary of
Transportation, shall:
(1) require that all salt storage facilities owned by private contractors,
the State, municipalities, or other governmental entity be mapped on the
VT LEG #379521 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.29
2025 Page 8 of 11
Agency of Natural Resources’ Natural Resources Atlas, and the types of
materials stored and storage practices at each facility be identified;
(2) establish best management practices and an education program for
the management of State-, town-, and privately owned salt storage facilities
and snow disposal practices to prevent runoff to surface and groundwater; and
(3) require that all State-, municipal-, and privately owned salt and sand
storage facilities within 100 yards of a surface water or drinking water source
be under cover by 2030 and all other storage facilities be under cover by 2035.
Facilities will be eligible for grant funding.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 1258 is amended to read:
§ 1258. MANAGEMENT OF WATERS AFTER CLASSIFICATION,;
ENFORCEMENT
(a) After the classification of any waters has been determined by the
Secretary, those waters shall be managed under the supervision of the
Secretary in order to obtain and maintain the classification established. The
Secretary may enforce a classification against any person affected thereby
who, with notice of the classification, has failed to comply. An action to
enforce a classification shall be brought in the Superior Court of the county
wherein the affected waters are located.
(b) The Secretary shall manage discharges to the waters of the State by
administering a permit program consistent with the National Pollutant
VT LEG #379521 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.29
2025 Page 9 of 11
Discharge Elimination System established by section Clean Water Act Section
402 of Public Law 92-500, 33 U.S.C. § 1342, and with the guidelines
promulgated in accordance with section Clean Water Act Section 304(h)(2) of
Public Law 92-500, 33 U.S.C. § 1314(h)(2). The Secretary shall use the full
range of possibilities and variables allowable under these sections of Public
Law 92-500 the federal Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. §§ 1251–1389, including
general permits, as are consistent with meeting the objectives of the Vermont
Water Pollution Control Program. The Secretary shall adopt a continuing
planning process approvable under section Clean Water Act Section 303(e) of
Public Law 92-500, 33 U.S.C. § 1313(e). Neither the Secretary nor his or her a
duly authorized representative may receive or during the previous two years
have received a significant portion of his or her income directly or indirectly
from permit holders or applicants for a permit under this chapter.
(c) When assessing compliance of waters in the State with the Vermont
Water Quality Standards; when monitoring waters as required by Clean Water
Act Section 303(d), 33 U.S.C. § 1313(d); and when a discharge to waters is
occurring, the Secretary shall monitor for compliance where the pollutant is
first discharged to or where runoff first enters a water or wetland of the State.
Sec. 3. IMPLEMENTATION; FEE REPORT
(a) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall adopt the best management
practices for commercial application of salt or salt alternatives required under
VT LEG #379521 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.29
2025 Page 10 of 11
10 V.S.A. § 1352 by procedure or by rulemaking authority under 10 V.S.A.
chapter 47. The Secretary of Natural Resources shall adopt any procedure or
rule establishing the best management practices for commercial and municipal
application of salt or salt alternatives on or before November 1, 2026 for initial
use beginning on January 1, 2027.
(b) As part of the consolidated Executive Branch annual fee report required
under 32 V.S.A. § 605, the Governor shall recommend a fee for certification of
commercial applicators under 10 V.S.A. chapter 47, subchapter 3A.
Sec. 4. ANR ENHANCED MONITORING OF CHLORIDE LEVELS IN
SURFACE WATERS
When a State water or water segment is identified as contaminated by
chloride levels that exceed the chronic or acute standards established by the
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA), the Secretary of Natural
Resources shall begin regular monitoring of the chloride levels in that water or
water segment and investigate potential acute and diffuse contamination
sources, such as impervious surfaces. If the source that is causing chloride
contamination levels that exceed EPA chronic or acute standards is found, the
Secretary of Natural Resources shall require monitoring at the physical
discharge point into a water of the State or into a hydrological connection to a
water of the State.
VT LEG #379521 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.29
2025 Page 11 of 11
Sec. 5. APPROPRIATIONS
(a) In addition to any other funds appropriated to the Agency of Natural
Resources in fiscal year 2026, $250,000.00 is appropriated from the General
Fund to the Agency of Natural Resources for a third-party vendor as
determined by the Secretary of Natural Resources in 10 V.S.A. § 1352(a) to
administer the Chloride Contamination Reduction Program.
(b) It is the intention of the General Assembly that the appropriation in
subsection (a) of this section shall be made annually for the identified
purposes.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379521 v.1